en: high in magnesium
xx: high in magnesium

en: high in zinc
xx: high in zinc

en: high in iodine
xx: high in iodine

en: Rich in vitamin B9
xx: Rich in vitamin B9
de: Reich an Vitamin B9
es: Rico en vitamina B9
fi: runsaasti B9-vitamiinia, runsaasti foolihappoa
fr: Riche en vitamine B9
he: עשיר בוויטמין B9, עתיר בוויטמין B9, עתיר ויטמין B9
hr: bogat vitaminom B9
hu: B9-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina B9
pt: Rico en vitamina B9

en: Rich in vitamin B12
xx: Rich in vitamin B12
de: Reich an Vitamin B12
es: Rico en vitamina B12
fi: runsaasti B12-vitamiinia, paljon B12-vitamiinia
fr: Riche en vitamine B12
he: עתיר בוויטמין B12, עשיר בוויטמין B12
hr: bogat vitaminom B12
hu: B12-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina B12
nl: rijk aan vitamine B12
pt: Rico en vitamina B12
sv: Rik på vitamin B12

en: Rich in vitamin C
ca: Ric en vitamina C
de: Reich an Vitamin C
es: Rico en vitamina C
fi: runsaasti C-vitamiinia, paljon C-vitamiinia
fr: Riche en vitamine C
he: עתיר בוויטמין C, עשיר בוויטמין C
hr: bogat vitaminom C
hu: C-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina C
nl: Rijk aan vitamine C
pt: Rico em vitamina C
ro: Bogat in vitamina C
sv: rik på vitamin C
th: แหล่งของวิตามินซี

en: Rich in vitamin D
xx: Rich in vitamin D
de: Reich an Vitamin D
es: Rico en vitamina D
fi: Runsaasti D-vitamiinia
fr: Riche en vitamine D
he: עשיר בוויטמין D, עתיר בוויטמין D
hr: bogat vitaminom D
hu: D-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina D
nl: rijk aan vitamine D
pt: Rico em vitamina D

en: Rich in vitamin E
xx: Rich in vitamin E
de: Reich an Vitamin E
es: Rico en vitamina E
fi: Runsaasti E-vitamiinia
fr: Riche en vitamine E
hr: bogat vitaminom E
hu: E-vitaminban gazdag
it: Ricco di vitamina E
nl: rijk aan vitamine E
pt: Rico em vitamina E

en: naturally rich in vitamin C, naturally rich in vit C
es: ricamente natural en vitamina C
fr: naturellement riche en vitamine C
hr: prirodno bogato vitaminom C
it: naturalmente ricco di vitamina C
pt: rico naturalmente em vitamina C

en: naturally rich in vitamin E
es: ricamente natural en vitamina E
fr: naturellement riche en vitamine E
hr: prirodno bogato vitaminom E
it: naturalmente ricco di vitamina E
pt: rico naturalmente em vitamina E

en: whole grain, wholegrain, wholemeal
da: fuldkorn
sv: fullkorn, fullkornsingrediens

en: with wholemeal flour
da: med fuldkornsmel
es: con farina integralna
fr: contient de la farine complète
hr: s integralnim brašnom
sv: med fullkornsmjöl

en: Rich in whole grain
sv: Fullkornsrik

en: The Danish Whole Grain Logo, The Whole Grain Logo
xx: Vælg fuldkorn først
da: Vælg fuldkorn først, Fuldkornslogoet

en: Planet Proof
xx: Planet Proof

en: Sustainable Palm Oil
bg: Устойчиво палмово масло
ca: Oli de Palma Sostenible
de: Nachhaltiges Palmöl
es: Aceite de Palma Sostenible
fi: Kestävästi tuotettua palmuöljyä
fr: Huile de palme durable, Huile de palme certifiée durable, Huile de palme issue de forêts gérées durablement
hr: održivo palmino ulje
hu: Fenntartható pálmaolaj
it: Olio di palma sostenibile
nl: Duurzame palmolie
pt: Óleo de palma sustentável
sv: Hållbarhetscertifierad palmolja

en: Roundtable on Sustainable Palm Oil, RSPO
bg: Кръгла маса на тема устойчиво палмово масло, RSPO
ca: Taula rodona per l'Oli de Palma Sostenible
de: Runder Tisch für nachhaltiges Palmöl, RSPO
fi: Roundtable on Sustainable Palm Oil, RSPO
fr: RSPO, Huile de palme RSPO, Huile de palme durable RSPO, Huile de palme durable certifiée RSPO
hr: Okrugli stol za održivo palmino ulje, RSPO
it: Tavola Rotonda sull'Olio di Palma Sostenibile
nl: RSPO

en: RSPO Identity Preserved, RSPO IP
fi: RSPO Identiteetti suojattu, RSPO IP
fr: RSPO Identité Préservée

en: RSPO Segregated, RSPO SG
fi: RSPO Erottelu, RSPO SG
fr: RSPO Séparé

en: RSPO Mass Balance, RSPO MB
ca: Equilibri de massa RSPO (taula per l'oli de palma sostenible)
fi: RSPO Massatase, RSPO MB